New Mexico, session 2026, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 30, Article 7 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] UNLAWFUL CARRYING OF A FIREARM WHILE TRAFFICKING A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE.-- A. Unlawful carrying of a firearm while trafficking a controlled substance consists of carrying a firearm while trafficking a controlled substance in violation of the provisions of Section 30-31-20 NMSA 1978. Whoever commits unlawful carrying of a firearm while trafficking a controlled substance is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. B. As used in this section, "firearm" means any weapon that will or is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosion or the frame or receiver of any such weapon." SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 2 -